Maine, session 132, LD256.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §1760, sub-§116 is enacted to read:
116. School supplies and electronic devices during August. Beginning August 1,
2026, sales of school supplies having a taxable value of $50 or less per item and one
electronic device per purchaser having a taxable value of $700 or less during the month of
August of each year. For the purposes of this subsection, "school supplies" includes, but is
not limited to, books, paper, notebooks, writing implements and other supplies specifically
intended for use in school. For purposes of this subsection, "electronic device" means a
desktop computer, laptop computer or tablet that is specifically intended for use for school.
"Electronic device" does not include a cellular telephone.